North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 8. Department of Labor.

§ 143A-67.
Creation.

There is hereby created a Department of Labor. The head of the Department of Labor is the Commissioner of Labor.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 10.

§ 143A-68.
Commissioner of Labor; powers and duties.

The Commissioner of Labor shall have such powers and duties as are conferred on him by this Chapter, delegated to him by the Governor, and conferred by the Constitution and laws of this State.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 10.

§ 143A-69.
Commissioner of Labor; transfer of powers and duties to Department.

Except as otherwise provided in the Constitution or in this Chapter, all powers, duties and functions vested by law in the Commissioner of Labor are transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Labor.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 10.

§ 143A-70.
Board of Boiler Rules and Bureau of Boiler Inspection; transfer.

The Board of Boiler Rules and the Bureau of Boiler Inspection, as contained in Article 7 of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, are hereby transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Labor.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 10.

§ 143A-71.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-72, s. 2(b), effective January 1, 2014.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 10; repealed by 2013-72, s. 2(b), effective January 1, 2014.

Cross References.

As to the Apprenticeship Council under the Department of Commerce, see

G.S. 115D-11.6

.

§ 143A-72.
Voluntary arbitration of labor disputes; appointment of arbitrator or panel; Commissioner of Labor; transfer.

All of the powers, duties and functions of the Commissioner of Labor under Article 4A of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, are transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Labor.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 10.